apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
LEXICON N6

: N1 ; 
N1 ;  ! Dir/LR     ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

!LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
!N1 ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
!:%>sh%{A%} ADV ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>sh%{A%} ADV ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
!:%>sh%{A%} N1 ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON

N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -vich
! Their feminine equivalets end with -ovna /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:vich NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:ovna NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:a NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND 

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;   ! COMMON because no plural

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASES ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Dont't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION


LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}n COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}ń COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}z COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}zl%{A%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}z COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}zl%{A%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%:ń COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ńl%{A%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ń%{I%}z COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>ńl%{A%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Alma teatrg'a bara<aor><p3><sg> ma? – Алмa в тeaтр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m COMMON-CLITICS ;                    ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>d%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>d%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IFI_EVID

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>t%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>t%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>m%{I%}z CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON V-MAKTA-INFL

%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLIT ; ! COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<subst%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASES ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASES ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<advl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+sız%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}y COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC
	
GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}m GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ń GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ńl%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ń%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ń%{I%}zl%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;


LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<aor%>:%>%{E%}  V-PERS-AOR ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}n  V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

%<aor%>%<evid%>:%>%{E%}d%{I%}% eken V-PERS-S1 ;    ! барады екенмін / бармайды екенмін
%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}n% eken V-PERS-S1 ;   ! барған екенмін / бармаған екенмін
%<ifi%>%<evid%>:%>%{I%}p V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;
%<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}s V-PERS-S1 ;

%<prog%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}t%{A%} V-MAKTA-INFL ;
!%<neg%>%<prog%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}t%{A%}% emes V-MAKTA-INFL ;  ! FIXME: negative form

LEXICON V-NONFINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

! Participles
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<prc_cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adverbs
%<gna_cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Verbal adjectives
%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}n V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}tuǵın V-ADJ ;
%<gpr_pot%>:%>%{I%}w%>sh%{I%} V-ADJ ;
!%<gpr_fut%>:%>%{A%}r V-ADJ ; ! Irregular NEG in -MAs ?

! Gerunds
%<ger%>:%>%{I%}w GER-INFL ;
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}n GER-INFL ;
%<ger_perf%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}n%>l%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_abs%>:%>%{I%}w%>sh%{I%}%>l%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}tuǵın GER-POSSESSIVES ;

! Imperatives
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ń%>l%{A%}r CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ń%{I%}z CLIT-EMPH ;
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ń CLIT-EMPH ;                ! Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
%<imp%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ń%{I%}z%>l%{A%}r CLIT-EMPH ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}y%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%'%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;              ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<opt%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%}y%{I%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}l%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;         ! FIXME check
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}l%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check
!%<opt%>%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}l%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;  ! FIXME check

 LEXICON Nouns
effekt:effekt N6 ; ! ""
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Niderland:Niderland NP-TOP ; ! ""
Gruziya:Gruziya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Qazaqstan:Qazaqstan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Parij:Parij NP-TOP ; ! ""
Pakistan:Pakistan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Evraziya:Evraziya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Turkistan:Turkistan NP-TOP ; ! "Turkistan" Dir/LR
bank:bank NP-TOP ; ! ""
Verniy:Verniy NP-TOP ; ! ""
Nyuton:Nyuton NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Altın:Altın NP-ANT-F ; ! "Altın" (Kazakh)
Qoja:Qoja NP-ANT-M ; ! "Qoja" (Arabic)
Láyla:Láyla NP-ANT-F ; ! "Läyla" (Arabic)
Sholpan:Sholpan NP-ANT-F ; ! "Sholpan" (Kazakh)
Musaev:Musaev NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Motorola:Motorola NP-ORG ; ! ""
GlaxoSmithKline:GlaxoSmithKline NP-AL ; ! ""
Bluetooth:Bluetooth NP-AL ; ! ""
iPhone:iPhone NP-AL ; ! ""
Android:Android NP-AL ; ! ""
Twitter:Twitter NP-AL ; ! ""
gadgetblog:gadgetblog NP-AL ; ! ""
microSD:microSD NP-AL ; ! ""
HTML:HTML NP-AL ; ! ""
Instagram:Instagram NP-AL ; ! ""
HTC:HTC NP-AL ; ! ""
Asqar:Asqar NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Joldasbay:Joldasbay NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Sapar:Sapar NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
arabsha:arabsha ADV-LANG ; ! "Arab"
bashqurtsha:bashqurtsha ADV-LANG ; ! ""
buryatsha:buryatsha ADV-LANG ; ! ""
grekshe:grekshe ADV-LANG ; ! "Greek"
guaranisha:guaranisha ADV-LANG ; ! ""
kalmaksha:kalmaksha ADV-LANG ; ! "Kalmyk"
qazaqsha:qazaqsha ADV-LANG ; ! "Kazakh"
qıtaysha:qıtaysha ADV-LANG ; ! "Chinese"
mońǵolsha:mońǵolsha ADV-LANG ; ! "Mongol" Dir/LR
nemisshe:nemisshe ADV-LANG ; ! "German"
polyaksha:polyaksha ADV-LANG ; ! ""
ukrainsha:ukrainsha ADV-LANG ; ! ""
chuvashsha:chuvashsha ADV-LANG ; ! "Chuvash"
LEXICON Common
bádik:bádik NP-AL ;
bádik:bádik NP-AL ;
Italiya% Birinshi% ligası:Italiya% Birinshi% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Qubla% futbol% ligası:Qubla% futbol% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Qoltıq% chempionlar% ligası:Qoltıq% chempionlar% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Lyuksemburg% ligası:Lyuksemburg% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Milliy% xokkey% ligası:Milliy% xokkey% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Asiya% chempionler% ligası:Asiya% chempionler% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Portugaliya% Premer%%-ligası:Portugaliya% Premer%%-ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Radikal% shep% koalitsiya:Radikal% shep% koalitsiya  NP-ORG ; !  
Rossiya% Premer%%-ligası:Rossiya% Premer%%-ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Sovet% Ekinshi% ligası:Sovet% Ekinshi% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Turkiya% ligası:Turkiya% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Vengriya% ligası:Vengriya% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Evropa% komissiyası:Evropa% komissiyası  NP-ORG ; !  
Yuba% ligası:Yuba% ligası  NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; !  
Ahaziya:Ahaziya  NP-ANT-M ; !  
Bine:Bine  NP-ANT-M ; !  
Erdal:Erdal  NP-ANT-M ; !  
Lut:Lut  NP-ANT-M ; !  
Ruen:Ruen  NP-ANT-M ; !  
Yaroslav:Yaroslav  NP-ANT-M ; !  
Sidney:Sidney  NP-ANT-M ; !  
Anna:Anna  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Emel:Emel  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Kámala:Kámala  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Margarita:Margarita  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Narimon:Narimon  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Almaz:Almaz  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Robiya:Robiya  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Tatyana:Tatyana  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Yelena:Yelena  NP-ANT-F ; !  
Annenkova:Annenkova  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Badesku:Badesku  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Banjevich:Banjevich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Boroevich:Boroevich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Brichenko:Brichenko  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Chernigova:Chernigova  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Delimustafich:Delimustafich  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Djordjevich:Djordjevich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Feyzich:Feyzich  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Gorohova:Gorohova  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Guangdung:Guangdung  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Imamovich:Imamovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Ivanich:Ivanich  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Kemerova:Kemerova  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Kicanovich:Kicanovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Kitanovskiy:Kitanovskiy  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Kvitesich:Kvitesich  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Loshakova:Loshakova  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Mahmudovich:Mahmudovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Milosavlyevich:Milosavlyevich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Najdenovskiy:Najdenovskiy  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Orlova:Orlova  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Paridovich:Paridovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Qutiyeva:Qutiyeva  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Rashidovich:Rashidovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Saltikov:Saltikov  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Sreckovich:Sreckovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Stalin:Stalin  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Suchkova:Suchkova  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Vasilykovich:Vasilykovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Xotamiy:Xotamiy  NP-COG-MF ; !  
Zilgalov:Zilgalov  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Zivadinovich:Zivadinovich  NP-PAT-VICH ; !  
Belarusiya:Belarusiya  NP-TOP ; !  
Mikolayiv:Mikolayiv  NP-TOP ; !  
Zolochiv:Zolochiv  NP-TOP ; !  
Kazakov:Kazakov  NP-COG-OV ; !  
Trajkov:Trajkov  NP-COG-OV ; !  
A% Seriyasi:A% Seriyasi  NP-ORG ; !  
BTR:BTR  NP-ORG ; !  
Toplamı% Sózligit% Turk:Toplamı% Sózligit% Turk  NP-ORG ; !  
Futbol:Futbol  NP-ORG ; !  
Interfaks:Interfaks  NP-ORG ; !  
Linuks:Linuks  NP-ORG ; !  
OIV:OIV  NP-ORG ; !  
River:River  NP-ORG ; !  
Twitter:Twitter  NP-ORG ; !  
